Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8305
Applicability of act.

(1) The Discount Medical Plan Organization Act applies to all discount medical plan organizations doing business in or from this state.

(2) A discount medical plan organization that is a health carrier is not required to obtain a certificate of registration under section 44-8306, except that each of its affiliates that operates as a discount medical plan organization in this state shall obtain a certificate of registration under section 44-8306 and comply with all other provisions of the act. The discount medical plan organization is required to comply with sections 44-8308 to 44-8311 and report, in the form and manner as the director may require, any of the information described in subsection (2) of section 44-8313 that is not otherwise already reported.

(3) A provider who provides discounts to his or her own patients without any cost or fee of any kind to the patient is not required to obtain and maintain a certificate of registration under the act as a discount medical plan organization.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 37.